Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.160

Persons ineligible for awards.

No award may be made under this chapter to any elected state official or state agency director.

[ 1993 c 467 s 7; 1987 c 387 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 467: See note following RCW 41.60.010.